pt-PT: Tipo de mesa de bilhar: Carambola; Operada a moedas; Convertível para refeições; Mesa para crianças; Combinação de vários jogos; Exterior; Pool; Snooker; Outros
zh-CN: 台球桌类型: 开仑台球桌; 投币式台球桌; 两用餐桌台球桌; 儿童桌面台球桌; 多功能游戏组合桌; 户外台球桌; 普尔台球桌; 斯诺克台球桌; 其他
cs: Typ kulečníkového stolu: Karambol; Na mince; Rozkládací jídelní; Dětský stolní; Víceúčelový; Venkovní; Pool; Snooker; Jiné
nl: Biljarttafel type: Carambole; Muntinworp; Omvormbaar tot eettafel; Tafelmodel voor kinderen; Combinatietafel; Buiten; Pool; Snooker; Anders
vi: Loại bàn bi-a: Carom; Hoạt động bằng tiền xu; Kết hợp bàn ăn; Bàn mini cho trẻ em; Kết hợp nhiều trò chơi; Ngoài trời; Pool (Bida lỗ); Snooker; Khác
es: Tipo de mesa de billar: Carambola; De monedas; Convertible en mesa de comedor; De mesa para niños; Combo multijuego; De exterior; Pool; Snooker; Otro
lt-LT: Biliardo stalo tipas: Karambolio; Monetinis; Transformuojamas į valgomojo stalą; Vaikiškas stalinis; Kelių žaidimų kombinuotas; Lauko; Pulo; Snukerio; Kita
ru: Тип бильярдного стола: Карамболь; С жетоноприемником; Трансформер (обеденный); Детский настольный; Многофункциональный (мульти-игра); Для улицы; Пул; Снукер; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta biljardne mize: Karambol; Na kovance; Jedilna miza (pretvorljiva); Otroška namizna; Kombinacija za več iger; Zunanja; Ameriški biljard (Pool); Snooker; Drugo
ko: 당구대 유형: 캐롬; 코인 작동식; 식탁 겸용; 어린이용 탁상형; 멀티 게임 콤보; 야외용; 풀; 스누커; 기타
fi: Biljardipöydän malli: Karamboli; Kolikkokäyttöinen; Muunnettava ruokapöytä; Lasten pöytämalli; Monipeliyhdistelmä; Ulkokäyttöön; Pool; Snooker; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de mesa de bilhar: Carambola; Operada por moedas; Conversível em mesa de jantar; De mesa para crianças; Combo multijogos; Para ambiente externo; Bilhar; Snooker; Outro
it: tipo di tavolo da biliardo: Carambola; A gettoni; Convertibile in tavolo da pranzo; Da tavolo per bambini; Combinato multigioco; Da esterno; Biliardo americano (Pool); Snooker; Altro
de: Typ des Billardtischs: Karambolage; Mit Münzeinwurf; Umwandelbarer Esstisch; Kinder-Tischauflage; Multi-Game-Kombi; Outdoor; Poolbillard; Snooker; Sonstige
th: ประเภทของโต๊ะบิลเลียด: แครอม; หยอดเหรียญ; แปลงเป็นโต๊ะอาหารได้; ตั้งโต๊ะสำหรับเด็ก; คอมโบหลายเกม; กลางแจ้ง; พูล; สนุกเกอร์; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Tip bilijarskog stola: Karambol; Na žetone/kovanice; Kombinirani blagovaonski; Dječji stolni; Višenamjenski set; Vanjski; Biljar (pool); Snooker; Ostalo
fr: Type de table de billard: Carambole; À pièces; Convertible en table à manger; De table pour enfants; Combo multi-jeux; D’extérieur; Américain; Snooker; Autre
bg-BG: Вид билярдна маса: Карамбол; С жетониера; Трансформираща се в трапезна; Детска настолна; Комбинирана; За открито; Пул; Снукър; Други
da: Type af billardbord: Karambole; Møntdrevet; Konverterbart spisebord; Bordmodel til børn; Kombibord til flere spil; Udendørs; Pool; Snooker; Andet
pl: Typ stołu bilardowego: Karambol; Z wrzutnikiem na monety; Bilardowo-jadalniany; Dziecięcy na stół; Wielofunkcyjny (combo); Zewnętrzny; Bilard (pool); Snooker; Inny
nb: Biljardbordtype: Karambole; Myntoperert; Konverterbart spisebord; Bordmodell for barn; Flerspills-kombo; Utendørs; Pool; Snooker; Annet
ja: ビリヤードテーブルタイプ: キャロム; コイン式; コンバーチブルダイニング; キッズテーブルトップ; マルチゲームコンボ; アウトドア; プール; スヌーカー; その他
ro-RO: Tipul mesei de biliard: Carambol; Cu fise; Masă de dining convertibilă; De masă, pentru copii; Combo multi-joc; De exterior; Biliard (Pool); Snooker; Altele
sv: Biljardbordstyp: Carambole; Myntdriven; Kombinerat matbord; Bordsmodell för barn; Multispel; Utomhus; Pool; Snooker; Övrigt
el: Τύπος τραπεζιού μπιλιάρδου: Γαλλικό μπιλιάρδο (Carom); Με κερματοδέκτη; Μετατρεπόμενο σε τραπέζι φαγητού; Επιτραπέζιο παιδικό; Πολλαπλών παιχνιδιών; Εξωτερικού χώρου; Αμερικάνικο μπιλιάρδο (Pool); Σνούκερ; Άλλο
hu: Biliárdasztal típusa: Karambol; Érmés; Étkezőasztallá alakítható; Asztali gyerekjáték; Többjátékos kombó; Kültéri; Pool; Snooker; Egyéb
en: Billiard table type: Carom; Coin-operated; Convertible dining; Kids tabletop; Multi-game combo; Outdoor; Pool; Snooker; Other
tr: Bilardo masası tipi: Karambol; Jetonlu; Yemek masasına dönüştürülebilir; Çocuk masa üstü; Çoklu oyun kombinasyonu; Dış mekan; Amerikan (Pool); Snooker; Diğer
zh-TW: 撞球桌類型: 開侖; 投幣式; 餐桌轉換式; 兒童桌上型; 多合一遊戲; 戶外; 花式撞球; 斯諾克; 其他
sk-SK: Typ biliardového stola: Karambol; Na mince; Konvertibilný jedálenský; Detský stolový; Kombinovaný na viac hier; Exteriérový; Pool; Snooker; Iný